North Carolina statutes. Chapter 52C. Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.
Article 9. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 52C-9-901.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, rewrote the section.

§ 52C-9-901.1.
Transitional provision.

This Chapter applies to proceedings begun on or after the effective date of this Chapter to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order, determination, or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

History.

2015-117, s. 1.

§ 52C-9-902.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this Chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this Chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Chapter are severable.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c).